Maryland, session 2025, SB0996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–101.
(a) Under the supervision of the State Board, and in accordance with regulations
and procedures adopted by the State Board, a local board shall conduct all elections held
under this article in the county in which the board is located.
(b) Except where it would be inappropriate, or as otherwise provided in this
article, the electoral process for primary elections, general elections, and special elections
shall be uniform.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0996*

SENATE BILL 996
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “APPROVAL VOTING” MEANS A METHOD OF
CASTING AND TABULATING VOTES IN WHICH VOTERS MAY CHOOSE ANY NUMBER OF
CANDIDATES AND THE CANDIDATE CHOSEN MOST OFTEN IS ELECTED.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY, BY LAW, ADOPT AN
APPROVAL VOTING METHOD FOR ELECTIONS FOR OFFICES IN THE EXECUTIVE OR
LEGISLATIVE BRANCHES OF COUNTY GOVERNMENT.
(3) A LOCAL LAW ENACTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PROVIDE FOR AN EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGN EXPLAINING HOW TO VOTE USING
APPROVAL VOTING.
(4) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE
ADMINISTRATION OF ELECTIONS CONDUCTED USING APPROVAL VOTING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.